Arkansas, session 2025, HB1161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-7-706(e), concerning an election to
change annuity options within one (1) year of retirement under the Arkansas
Teacher Retirement System, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, a
retiree who retired on or after July 1, 1994, may elect to cancel his or her
election made at retirement for receiving an annuity and elect another
option, provided that he or she does the following within one (1) year of
retirement:
(A) Does so within one (1) year after July 1, 1995, or
within one (1) year of retirement;
(B) Files with the system a new election form approved by
the system; and
(C)(i)(B)(i) Repays to the system the difference between
*LJH005*
01/16/2025 9:48:01 AM LJH005

HB1161
the amount of the annuity received when he or she retired and the new annuity
due as a result of the election change, plus interest from July 1, 1994, or
his or her retirement date, whichever is later, to the date of payment in
full.
(ii) The difference shall be calculated retroactively
to July 1, 1994, or his or her the retiree's retirement date, whichever is
later.
(2) The election to change shall be made only one (1) time.
(3) The election change shall be effective retroactively to the
effective date of his or her annuity the month following the retiree's
fulfillment of the requirements specified under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state
public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the
General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq., need immediate revision and updating to
address administrative complexities caused by these provisions and to bring
these provisions into conformance with sound public pension policy and
actuarial requirements; that the revisions and updates are of great
importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other
citizens of the State of Arkansas; that as the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30, an effective date of
July 1, 2025, is necessary in order to allow the provisions within this act
to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to allow for a structured
and proper administration of the procedures referenced in this act; that the
updates and revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of
great importance and necessary for protecting member benefits and clarifying
the reporting and contribution requirements of employers participating in the
Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order
to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas
Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health,
and safety, shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
01/16/2025 9:48:01 AM LJH005